Washington statutes.
RCW 18.16.320

Department of licensing tuition recovery trust fund—State treasurer.

The department of licensing tuition recovery trust fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from each school owner under RCW 18.16.310 must be deposited into the fund. Expenditures from the fund may be used only for the purposes in RCW 18.16.310. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the fund. The fund is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2018 c 203 s 10.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2018 c 203: See note following RCW 28B.85.095.